test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonyminaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonyminaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonymiwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonymiwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonymiwaabniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsminaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsminaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsminaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsmiwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsmiwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsmiwaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonymiwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonymiwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonyminwibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonyminwibniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonsmiwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsmiwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonsminwibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonyshinaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonyshinaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonyshinaanbaniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsshinaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsshinaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsshinaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonyshinaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonyshinaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonyshinaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonyshiwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonyshiwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonyshiwaabniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsshinaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsshinaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsshinaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsshiwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsshiwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsshiwaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonyshiwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonyshiwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonyshinwibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonyshinwibniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonsshiwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsshiwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonsshinwibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoomshinaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoomshinaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoomshinaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoomshinaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoomshinaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoomshinaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoomshiwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoomshiwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoomshiwaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoomshiwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoomshiwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoomshinwibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoomshinwibniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonymishnaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonymishnaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonymishnaanbaniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsmishnaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsmishnaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsmishnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonymishnaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonymishnaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonymishnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonymishwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonymishwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonymishwaabniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsmishnaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsmishnaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsmishwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsmishwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishwaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonymishwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonymishwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonymishniwbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonymishniwbaniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonsmishwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsmishwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonsmishniwbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsmishniwbaniing
     
